src/morphology/stems/suffixes.lexc
-tuntoisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:tuntoisesti   PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-tuntoisuus%+N:tuntoisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-tuotantoinen%+A:tuotantoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tuottoinen%+A:tuottoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-turkkinen%+A:turkki    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-turpainen%+A:turpai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tuumainen%+A:tuumai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-tyvinen%+A:tyvi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-töinen%+A:töi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-ulotteinen%+A:ulottei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-uskoinen%+A:uskoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-uskoisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:uskoisesti PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-uskoisuus%+N:uskoisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-vaatteinen%+A:vaattei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vahvikkeinen%+A:vahvikkei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vahvisteinen%+A:vahvistei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vaiheinen%+A:vaihei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vaihteinen%+A:vaihtei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vaikutteinen%+A:vaikuttei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vaikutteisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:vaikutteisesti PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-vaikutteisuus%+N:vaikutteisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-vaikutuksinen%+A:vaikutuksi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vainuinen%+A:vainui    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vaippainen%+A:vaippai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vaistoinen%+A:vaistoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vaistoisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:vaistoisesti PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-vaistoisuus%+N:vaistoisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-valintainen%+A:valintai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-valkuaisinen%+A:valkuaisi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-valmisteinen%+A:valmistei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-valtainen%+A:valtai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-valtaisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:valtaisesti   PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-varaisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:varaisesti PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-varaisuus%+N:varaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-varpainen%+A:varpai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-varsinen%+A:varsi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vartaloinen%+A:vartaloi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vartinen%+A:varti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vastuinen%+A:vastui    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vastuisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:vastuisesti   PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-vastuksinen%+A:vastuksi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vatsainen%+A:vatsai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vauhtinen%+A:vauhti    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-verkkoinen%+A:verkkoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-viikkoinen%+A:viikkoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-viiksinen%+A:viiksi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-viivainen%+A:viivai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-viivaisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:viivaisesti   PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-viivaisuus%+N:viivaisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-vikainen%+A:vikai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vikaisuus%+N:vikaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-vireinen%+A:virei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-vireisyys%+N:vireisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS   ;
-virheinen%+A:virhei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-viritteinen%+A:virittei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-virvilä%+N:virvil  NOUN_HÄKKYRÄ   ;
-vitamiininen%+A:vitamiini  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-voimainen%+A:voimai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-voimaisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:voimaisesti   PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-voimaisuus%+N:voimaisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-vointinen%+A:vointi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vointisuus%+N:vointisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-voipa%+A:voi   ADJ_VOIPA ;
-voittoinen%+A:voittoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-voittoisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:voittoisesti PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-vooninkinen%+A:vooninki    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vooninkinen%+N:vooninki    NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN ;
-vuokrainen%+A:vuokrai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vuorinen%+A:vuori  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vuoroinen%+A:vuoroi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vuorolainen%+A:vuorolai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vuotias%+A:vuotia  ADJ_AUTUAS    ;
-vuotinen%+A:vuoti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-vyötäröinen%+A:vyötäröi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-väestöinen%+A:väestöi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-väestöllinen%+A:väestölli  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-väkinen%+A:väki    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-välinen%+A:väli    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-välitteinen%+A:välittei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-välityksinen%+A:välityksi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-välkkeinen%+A:välkkei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-väritteinen%+A:värittei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-värityksinen%+A:värityksi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-yksikköinen%+A:yksikköi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-ymmärteinen%+A:ymmärtei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-ymmärteisyys%+N:ymmärteisyy    NOUN_KÖYHYYS   ;
-älyinen%+A:älyi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-älyisyys%+N:älyisyy    NOUN_KÖYHYYS   ;
-äänisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:äänisesti   PCLE_TYHMÄSTI   ;
-ääntöinen%+A:ääntöi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;

aaltoinen+A:aaltoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
aatteinen+A:aattei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
aiheinen+A:aihei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
aineinen+A:ainei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
aineksinen+A:aineksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
aistinen+A:aisti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
ajatuksinen+A:ajatuksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
akselinen+A:akseli  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
alkuinen+A:alkui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
aloitteinen+A:aloittei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
alueinen+A:aluei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
annoksinen+A:annoksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
arominen+A:aromi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
aseinen+A:asei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
asenteinen+A:asentei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
asentoinen+A:asentoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
askelinen+A:askeli  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
asteelainen+A:asteelai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
asteikkoinen+A:asteikkoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
asteinen+A:astei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
asuinen+A:asui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
avioinen+A:avioi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
avioisuus+A:avioisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
avusteinen+A:avustei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
ehtoinen+A:ehtoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
ehtoisesti+Adv:ehtoisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
ehtoisuus+A:ehtoisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
eleinen+A:elei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
eleisesti+Adv:eleisesti     ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
eleisyys+N:eleisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
enteinen+A:entei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
esteinen%+A:estei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
frekvenssinen+A:frekvenssi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
haiveninen+A:haiveni  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
hakuinen+A:hakui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
hakuisesti+Adv:hakuisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
hakuisuus+A:hakuisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
halkioinen+A:halkioi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
hameinen+A:hamei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
hammasteinen+A:hammastei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
hammastuksinen+A:hammastuksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
hampainen+A:hampai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
hankaiminen+A:hankaimi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
hankainen+A:hankai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
hapsuinen+A:hapsui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
harjainen+A:harjai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
harjaksinen+A:harjaksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
harteinen+A:hartei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
hartiainen+A:hartiai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
heimoinen+A:heimoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
heittoinen+A:heittoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
helainen+A:helai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
helmainen+A:helmai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
heteinen+A:hetei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
hetkinen+A:hetki     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
hevosvoimainen+A:hevosvoimai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
hihainen+A:hihai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
hiilinen+A:hiili     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
himoinen+A:himoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
hiuksinen+A:hiuksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
hoitoinen+A:hoitoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
hoitoisuus+A:hoitoisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
holvinen+A:holvi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
housuinen+A:housui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
huippuinen+A:huippui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
huoneinen+A:huonei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
huulinen+A:huuli  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
häiriöinen+A:häiriöi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
häntäinen+A:häntäi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
ihoinen+A:ihoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
ikkunainen+A:ikkunai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
ilkinen+A:ilki     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
ilmastoinen+A:ilmastoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
intoinen+A:intoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
iskuinen+A:iskui  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
jakoinen+A:jakoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
jalkainen+A:jalkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
johtoinen+A:johtoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
joukkueinen+A:joukkuei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
jousinen+A:jousi  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
juoksuinen+A:juoksui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
jussi+N:juss  NOUN_RUUVI  ;
järkinen+A:järki     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
jäähdytteinen+A:jäähdyttei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
kaarinen+A:kaari  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kaateinen+A:kaatei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kahvainen+A:kahvai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kaikuinen+A:kaikui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kaistainen+A:kaistai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kaliiberinen+A:kaliiberi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kaliiperinen+A:kaliiperi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kalloinen+A:kalloi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kalorinen+A:kalori  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kamarinen+A:kamari  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kammioinen+A:kammioi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kansinen+A:kansi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kantainen+A:kantai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kantaisuus+A:kantaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
kantinen+A:kanti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
karaattinen+A:karaatti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
karvainen+A:karvai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kasvoinen+A:kasvoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kasvuinen+A:kasvui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kasvuisuus+A:kasvuisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
katseinen+A:katsei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
katseisuus+A:katseisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
kattoinen+A:kattoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kaulainen+A:kaulai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kauluksinen+A:kauluksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kaupalla+Adv:kaupalla  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
kautinen+A:kauti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kehyksinen+A:kehyksi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
kehysteinen+A:kehystei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
kenkäinen+A:kenkäi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
kertainen+A:kertai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kertaisesti+Adv:kertaisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
kertaistaa+N:kertaist   VERB_MUTRISTAA ;
kertaistua+N:kertaistu  VERB_KAUNISTUA ;
kielinen+A:kieli     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
kielisyys+N:kielisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS  ;
kierroksinen+A:kierroksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kiihkoinen+A:kiihkoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kiiltoinen+A:kiiltoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kiinnitteinen+A:kiinnittei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
kiinnityksinen+A:kiinnityksi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
kiitäjäinen+A:kiitäjäi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
kinttuinen+A:kinttui  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
kiristeinen+N:kiristei     NOUN_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
kirjaiminen+A:kirjaimi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kirjoinen+A:kirjoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kiskoinen+A:kiskoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kohtainen+A:kohtai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kohtaisesti+Adv:kohtaisesti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
kohtaisuus+A:kohtaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
koipinen+A:koipi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kokkainen+A:kokkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
koneinen+A:konei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
koristeinen+A:koristei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
korkoinen+A:korkoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
korsinen+A:korsi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kortinen+A:korti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
korvainen+A:korvai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kourainen+A:kourai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kudoksinen+A:kudoksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kudontainen+A:kudontai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kuinen+A:kui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kukintainen+A:kukintai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kukintoinen+A:kukintoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kulkuinen+A:kulkui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kulmainen+A:kulmai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kulmio+N:kulmio NOUN_TUOMIO  ;
kuntoinen+A:kuntoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kuonoinen+A:kuonoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kuorinen+A:kuori  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kupeinen+A:kupei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kupolinen+A:kupoli  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kurkkuinen+A:kurkkui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kutoinen+A:kutoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kutrinen+A:kutri  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kutuinen+A:kutui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kuumenteinen+A:kuumentei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kuutioinen+A:kuutioi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
kykyinen+A:kykyi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
kylkinen+A:kylki     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
kymppinen+A:kymppi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
kyntinen+A:kynti     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
kynäinen+A:kynäi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
kyttyräinen+A:kyttyräi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
kärkinen+A:kärki     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
käsitteinen+A:käsittei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
kätinen+A:käti     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
kätisesti+Adv:kätisesti     ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
käyttöinen+A:käyttöi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
käytöksinen+A:käytöksi     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
käänteinen+A:kääntei     ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
laaksoinen+A:laaksoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN   ;
laatuisuus+A:laatuisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
lahjainen+A:lahjai  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
